Utah statutes.
77-7-20.   Service of citation on defendant -- Filing in court -- Contents
of citations.
(1)  If a citation is issued pursuant to Section 77-7-18, the peace officer or
public official shall issue one copy to the person cited and shall within five
days file a duplicate copy with the court specified in the citation.
(2)  Each copy of the citation issued under authority of this chapter shall
contain:
(a)  the name of the court before which the person is to appear;
(b)  the name of the person cited;
(c)  a brief description of the offense charged;
(d)  the date, time and place at which the offense is alleged to have
occurred;
(e)  the date on which the citation was issued;
(f)  the name of the peace officer or public official who issued the citation,
and the name of the arresting person if an arrest was made by a private party
and the citation was issued in lieu of taking the arrested person before a
magistrate;
(g)  the time and date on or before and after which the person is to appear;
(h)  the address of the court in which the person is to appear;
(i)  a certification above the signature of the officer issuing the citation
in substantially the following language: "I certify that a copy of this
citation or information (Summons and Complaint) was duly served upon the
defendant according to law on the above date and I know or believe and so
allege that the above-named defendant did commit the offense herein set forth
contrary to law.  I further certify that the court to which the defendant has
been directed to appear is the proper court pursuant to Section 77-7-21."; and
(j)  a notice containing substantially the following language:
READ CAREFULLY
This citation is not an information and will not be used as an information
without your consent.  If an information is filed you will be provided a copy
by the court.  You MUST appear in court on or before the time set in this
citation.  IF YOU FAIL TO APPEAR, THE COURT MAY ISSUE A WARRANT FOR YOUR
ARREST.
